Utah statutes.
53B-24-202.   Medical Education Program.

(1)  There is created a Medical Education Program to be administered by the Medical Education Council in cooperation with the Division of Finance.

(2)  The program shall be funded from money received for graduate medical education from:

(a)  the federal Health Care Financing Administration or other federal agency;

(b)  state appropriations; and

(c)  donation or private contributions.

(3)  All funding for this program shall be nonlapsing.

(4)  Program money may only be expended if:

(a)  approved by the council; and

(b)  used for graduate medical education in accordance with Subsection 53B-24-303(7).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 28, 2013 General Session

